Connecticut, session 2026, HB05290.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 22a-109 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) The zoning commission may by regulation exempt any or all of
the following uses from the coastal site plan review requirements of this
chapter: (1) Minor additions to or modifications of existing buildings or
detached accessory buildings, such as garages and utility sheds; (2)
construction of new or modification of existing structures incidental to
the enjoyment and maintenance of residential property including but
not limited to walks, terraces, elevated decks, driveways, swimming
pools, tennis courts, docks and detached accessory buildings; (3)
construction of new or modification of existing on-premise structures
including fences, walls, pedestrian walks and terraces, underground
utility connections, essential electric, gas, telephone, water and sewer
service lines, signs and such other minor structures as will not
LCO No. 1571 1 of 3

Raised Bill No. 5290
substantially alter the natural character of coastal resources or restrict
access along the public beach; (4) activities conducted for the specific
purpose of conserving or preserving soil, vegetation, water, fish,
shellfish, wildlife and other coastal land and water resources; (5) interior
modifications to buildings; [and] (6) minor changes in use of a building,
structure or property except those changes occurring on property
adjacent to or abutting coastal waters; and (7) construction of a single-
family residential structure except when such structure is (A) located on
an island not connected to the mainland by an existing road bridge or
causeway, or (B) in or within one hundred feet of the following coastal
resource areas: Tidal wetlands, coastal bluffs and escarpments and
beaches and dunes. Gardening, grazing and the harvesting of crops
shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter. If a zoning
commission adopts an exemption pursuant to subdivision (7) of this
subsection, such commission shall, not less than quarterly, submit a
report to the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
detailing any such single-family residential structure approved by the
commission during the period covered by such report. Notwithstanding
the provisions of this subsection, shoreline flood and erosion control
structures as defined in subsection (c) of this section shall not be exempt
from the requirements of this chapter.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 22a-109(b)